Tennessee, session 114, HB2275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2006(c)(1), is amended by
deleting "thirty (30) days" and substituting "forty-five (45) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2275
012303
- 1 -